New York, session 2025-2026, S6425.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Barreto's law". 3 § 2. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 125.11-a to read 4 as follows: 5 § 125.11-a Vehicular manslaughter in the third degree. 6 A person is guilty of vehicular manslaughter in the third degree when 7 such person causes the death of another person, and either: 8 (1) engages in reckless driving in violation of section twelve hundred 9 twelve of the vehicle and traffic law, 10 (2) commits the crime of aggravated unlicensed operation of a motor 11 vehicle in the third degree in violation of section five hundred eleven 12 of the vehicle and traffic law, or 13 (3) commits the crime of driving any motor vehicle while uninsured 14 pursuant to section three thousand four hundred twenty of the insurance 15 law. 16 Vehicular manslaughter in the third degree is a class E felony. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09013-04-5